Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Article 25. Vacancies in Office.

§ 23-15-831.
Appointments by Governor to fill vacancies in state or state district elected offices other than in Legislature.

When a vacancy other than in the Legislature occurs by death, resignation or otherwise, in any state or state district elected office, and there is no special provision of law for filling the vacancy, the same shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the Governor.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-195 [Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 7, art 6 (2); 1857, ch. 4, art 26; 1871, § 394; 1880, § 154; 1892, § 3681; 1906, § 4188; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6822; 1930, § 6262; 1942, § 3291; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 248; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 132, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-832.
Notice to Secretary of State of vacancy in office for which special election is required to be called to fill.

When a vacancy shall occur in an elective office for which a special election is required to be called to fill, the entity with whom candidates for the office are required to qualify shall notify the Secretary of State of the vacancy within five (5) days after it receives knowledge of the vacancy.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 528, § 2, eff August 7, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section).

§ 23-15-833.
Special elections to fill vacancies in county, county district, and district attorney offices, and office of circuit judge or chancellor.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each year shall be designated the regular special election day, and on that day an election shall be held to fill any vacancy in county, county district, and district attorney elective offices, and any vacancy in the office of circuit judge or chancellor.

All special elections, or elections to fill vacancies, shall in all respects be held, conducted and returned in the same manner as general elections, except that where no candidate receives a majority of the votes cast in the election, a runoff election shall be held three (3) weeks after the election. The two (2) candidates who receive the highest popular votes for the office shall have their names submitted as the candidates to the runoff and the candidate who leads in the runoff election shall be elected to the office. When there is a tie in the first election of those receiving the next highest vote, these two (2) and the one receiving the highest vote, none having received a majority, shall go into the runoff election and whoever leads in the runoff election shall be entitled to the office.

In those years when the regular special election day shall occur on the same day as the general election, the names of candidates in any special election and the general election shall be placed on the same ballot, but shall be clearly distinguished as general election candidates or special election candidates. At any time a special election is held on the same day as a party primary election, the names of the candidates in the special election may be placed on the same ballot, but shall be clearly distinguished as special election candidates or primary election candidates.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-203 [Codes, 1880, § 158; 1892, § 3685; 1906, § 4193; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6827; 1930, § 6267; 1942, § 3296; Laws, 1954, ch. 356; Laws, 1984, ch. 465, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 249; Laws, 2007, ch. 434, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 509, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 133, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-835.
Notice of special election for county or county district office; election procedures.

The election commissioners of the several counties to whom the writ of election may be directed shall, immediately upon receipt of the writ, give notice of the special election to fill a vacancy in such county or county district office by posting notices at the courthouse and in each supervisor’s district in the county for ninety (90) days before the election; and the election shall be prepared for and held as in case of a general election.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-199 [Codes, 1880, § 155; 1892, § 3682; 1906, § 4191; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6825; 1930, § 6265; 1942, § 3294; Laws, 1966, ch. 615, § 3; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 250; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 134, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-837.
Procedure where only one person has qualified for candidacy in special election for state district office
or legislative office.

When a special election is called to fill any state district office or legislative office and where only one (1) person has duly qualified with the State Board of Election Commissioners to be a candidate in the special election within the time prescribed by law for qualifying as a candidate, the State Board of Election Commissioners shall make a finding and determination of that fact, which shall be duly entered upon its official minutes.

A finding and determination and certification to office by the State Board of Election Commissioners, as herein provided, shall dispense with the holding of the special election.

A certified copy of the finding and determination of the State Board of Election Commissioners shall be filed with the Governor, and the Governor shall appoint the candidate so certified to fill the unexpired term.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-196 [Laws, 1979, ch. 343, §§ 1, 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 303, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 251; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 135, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-839.
Appointments to fill vacancies in county or county district offices; special election procedures; procedure where only one person has qualified for candidacy in special election.

When a vacancy occurs in any county or county district office, the same shall be filled by appointment by the board of supervisors of the county, by order entered upon its minutes, where the vacancy occurs, or by appointment of the president of the board of supervisors, by and with the consent of the majority of the board of supervisors, if such vacancy occurs when the board is not in session, and the clerk of the board shall certify to the Secretary of State the appointment, and the appointed person shall be commissioned by the Governor; and if the unexpired term be longer than six (6) months, such appointee shall serve until a successor is elected as hereinafter provided, unless the regular special election day on which the vacancy should be filled occurs in a year in which an election would normally be held for that office as provided by law, in which case the person so appointed shall serve the unexpired portion of the term. Such vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term by the qualified electors at the next regular special election day occurring more than ninety (90) days after the vacancy occurs. The board of supervisors of the county shall, within ten (10) days after the vacancy occurs, make an order, in writing, directed to the election commissioners, commanding an election to be held on the next regular special election day to fill the vacancy. The election commissioners shall require each candidate to qualify at least sixty (60) days before the date of the election, and shall give a certificate of election to the person elected, and shall return to the Secretary of State a copy of the order of holding the election, showing the election results, certified by the clerk of the board of supervisors. The person elected shall be commissioned by the Governor to take office once the election is certified.

In any election ordered pursuant to this section where only one (1) person qualifies with the election commissioners to be a candidate within the time provided by law, the election commissioners shall certify to the board of supervisors that there is only one (1) candidate. Thereupon, the board of supervisors shall dispense with the election and appoint the certified candidate to fill the unexpired term. The clerk of the board shall certify the appointed candidate to the Secretary of State and the candidate shall be commissioned by the Governor. In the event no person qualifies by 5:00 p.m. sixty (60) days before the date of the election, the election commissioners shall certify that fact to the board of supervisors who shall dispense with the election and fill the vacancy by appointment. The clerk of the board of supervisors shall certify the appointment to the Secretary of State, and the appointed person shall be commissioned by the Governor.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-197 [Codes, 1906, § 4189; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6823; 1930, § 6263; 1942, § 3292; Laws, 1900, ch. 79; Laws, 1948, ch. 259; Laws, 1958, ch. 542; Laws, 1966 ch. 615, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 465, § 2; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 252; Laws, 1987, ch. 499, § 17; Laws, 1993, ch. 303, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 592, § 12; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 136, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-841.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 441, § 201, effective from and after July 1, 2017.

§23-15-541. [Derived from 1972 Code § 3157 [Codes, 1906, § 3713; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6405; 1930, § 5910; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 253, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§ 23-15-843.
Special elections to fill vacancies in office of district attorney; emergency appointments.

In case of death, resignation or vacancy from any cause in the office of district attorney, the unexpired term of which shall exceed six (6) months, the Governor shall within ten (10) days after the vacancy occurs issue a proclamation calling an election to fill a vacancy in the office of district attorney to be held on the next regular special election day in the district where the vacancy occurred unless the vacancy occurs in a year in which a general election would normally be held for that office as provided by law, in which case the appointed person shall serve the unexpired portion of the term. Candidates in such a special election shall qualify in the same manner and be subject to the same time limitations as set forth in Section 23-15-839. Pending the holding of a special election, the Governor shall make an emergency appointment to fill the vacancy until the same shall be filled by election.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-233 [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6840; 1930, § 6283; 1942, § 3312; Laws, 1914, ch. 150; Laws, 1973, ch. 362, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 314, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 465, § 3; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 254; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 137, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§§ 23-15-845 and 23-15-847.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 102, eff from and after September 6, 1994 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the repeal of this section).

§23-15-845. Derived from 1972 Code § 3150 [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6430; 1930, § 5903; Laws, 1916, ch. 616; Repealed by Laws 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; En, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 255 [Am Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 27]

§23-15-847. Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-61 [Codes, 1942, § 3190; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; En, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 256 [Am Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 28]

§ 23-15-849.
Special elections to fill vacancies in office of justice of Supreme Court, judge of Court of Appeals, circuit judge, or chancellor; interim appointments.

Vacancies in the office of circuit judge or chancellor shall be filled for the unexpired term by the qualified electors at the next regular special election occurring more than nine (9) months after the vacancy to be filled occurred, and the term of office of the person elected to fill a vacancy shall commence on the first Monday in January following the election. Upon the occurrence of a vacancy, the Governor shall appoint a qualified person from the district in which the vacancy exists to hold the office and discharge the duties thereof until the vacancy is filled by election as provided in this subsection.

If half or more than half of the term remains, vacancies in the office of justice of the Supreme Court or judge of the Court of Appeals shall be filled for the unexpired term by the qualified electors at the next regular election for state officers or for representatives in Congress occurring more than nine (9) months after the vacancy to be filled occurred, and the term of office of the person elected to fill a vacancy shall commence on the first Monday in January following the election. If less than half of the term remains, vacancies in the office of justice of the Supreme Court or judge of the Court of Appeals shall be filled for the remaining unexpired term solely by appointment as provided in this subsection.

Upon occurrence of a vacancy, the Governor shall appoint a qualified person from the district in which the vacancy exists to hold the office and discharge the duties thereof as follows:

If less than half of the term remains, the appointee shall serve until expiration of the term;

If half or more than half of the term remains, the appointee shall serve until the vacancy is filled by election as provided in subsection (1) of this section for judges of the circuit and chancery courts. Elections to fill vacancies in the office of justice of the Supreme Court or judge of the Court of Appeals shall be held, conducted, returned and the persons elected commissioned in accordance with the law governing regular elections for justices of the Supreme Court or judges of the Court of Appeals to the extent applicable.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-247 [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6855; 1930, § 6287; 1942, §§ 3190, 3316; Laws, 1916, ch. 161; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 257; Laws, 1993, ch. 518, § 29; Laws, 2002, ch. 586, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 509, § 4; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 138, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-851.
Elections to fill vacancies in offices in Legislature; notice.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, within thirty (30) days after vacancies occur in either house of the Legislature, the Governor shall issue writs of election to fill the vacancies on a day specified in the writ of election. At least sixty (60) days’ notice shall be given of the election in each county or part of a county in which the election shall be held. The qualifying deadline for the election shall be fifty (50) days before the election. Notice of the election shall be posted at the courthouse and in each supervisors district in the county or part of county in which such election shall be held for as near sixty (60) days as may be practicable. The election shall be prepared for and held as in the case of a general election.

If a vacancy occurs in a calendar year in which the general election for state officers is held, the Governor may elect not to issue a writ of election to fill the vacancy.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-201 [Codes, 1857, ch 4, art 29; 1871, § 395; 1880, § 157; 1892, § 3684; 1906, § 4192; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6826; 1930, § 6266; 1942, § 3295; Laws, 1956, ch. 405, § 1; Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 258; Laws, 2007, ch. 570, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 139, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-853.
Special elections to fill vacancies in representation in Congress; notice; qualification by candidates.

If a vacancy occurs in the representation in Congress, the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term by a special election, to be ordered by the Governor, within sixty (60) days after the vacancy occurs, and held at a time fixed by his or her order, and which time shall be not less than sixty (60) days after the issuance of the order of the Governor, which shall be directed to the election commissioners of the several counties of the district, who shall, immediately on the receipt of the order, give notice of the election by publishing the same in a newspaper having a general circulation in the county and by posting the notice at the front door of the courthouse. The order shall also be directed to the State Board of Election Commissioners. The election shall be prepared for and conducted, and returns shall be made, in all respects as provided for a special election to fill vacancies.

Candidates for the office in such an election must qualify with the Secretary of State by 5:00 p.m. not less than fifty (50) days before the date of the election. If the fiftieth day to qualify before an election falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, the qualification submitted on the business day immediately following the Sunday or legal holiday shall be accepted. The election commissioners shall have printed on the ballot in such special election the name of any candidate who shall have been requested to be a candidate for the office by a petition filed with the Secretary of State and personally signed by not less than one thousand (1,000) qualified electors of the district. The petition shall be filed by 5:00 p.m. not less than fifty (50) days before the date of the election. If the fiftieth day to file the petition before an election falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, the petition filed on the business day immediately following the Sunday or legal holiday shall be accepted.

There shall be attached to each petition above provided for, upon the time of filing with the Secretary of State, a certificate from the appropriate registrar or registrars showing the number of qualified electors appearing upon each petition which the registrar shall furnish to the petitioner upon request.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-221 [Codes, 1857, ch. 4, art 35; 1871, § 361; 1880, § 162; 1892, § 3689; 1906, § 4196; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6830; 1930, § 6275; 1942, § 3304; Laws, 1968 ch. 572, §§ 1, 2; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 259; Laws, 2000, ch. 592, § 13; Laws, 2007, ch. 604, § 5; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 140, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-855.
Elections to fill vacancies in office of U.S. Senator; interim appointments by Governor.

If a vacancy shall occur in the office of United States Senator from Mississippi by death, resignation or otherwise, the Governor shall, within ten (10) days after receiving official notice of the vacancy, issue a proclamation for an election to be held in the state to elect a Senator to fill the remaining unexpired term, provided the unexpired term is more than twelve (12) months and the election shall be held within ninety (90) days from the time the proclamation is issued and the returns of such election shall be certified to the Governor in the manner set out above for regular elections, unless the vacancy occurs in a year in which a general state or congressional election is held, in which event the Governor’s proclamation shall designate the general election day as the time for electing a Senator, and the vacancy shall be filled by appointment as hereinafter provided.

In case of a vacancy in the office of United States Senator, the Governor may appoint a Senator to fill the vacancy temporarily, and if the United States Senate be in session at the time the vacancy occurs the Governor shall appoint a Senator within ten (10) days after receiving official notice thereof, and the appointed Senator shall serve until a successor is elected and commissioned as provided for in subsection (1) of this section, provided that such unexpired term as he or she may be appointed to fill shall be for a longer time than one (1) year, but if for a shorter time than one (1) year, he or she shall serve for the full time of the unexpired term and no special election shall be called by the Governor but a successor shall be elected at the regular election.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-229 [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6835; 1930, § 6279; 1942, § 3308; Laws, 1914, ch. 148] and §23-5-231 [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6836; 1930, § 6280; 1942, § 3309; Laws, 1914, ch. 148], both repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 260; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-857.
Appointments to fill vacancies in elective offices in cities, towns, or villages; elections to fill such offices; procedure where no person or only one person has qualified as candidate.

When there is a vacancy in an elective office in a city, town or village, the unexpired term of which shall not exceed six (6) months, the same shall be filled by appointment by the governing authority or remainder of the governing authority of the city, town or village. The municipal clerk shall certify the appointment to the Secretary of State and the appointed person or persons shall be commissioned by the Governor.

When there is a vacancy in an elective office in a city, town or village, the unexpired term of which shall exceed six (6) months, the governing authority or remainder of the governing authority of the city, town or village shall make and enter on the minutes an order for an election to be held in the city, town or village to fill the vacancy and fix a date upon which the election shall be held. The order shall be made and entered upon the minutes at the next regular meeting of the governing authority after the vacancy occurs, or at a special meeting to be held not later than ten (10) days after the vacancy occurs, Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays excluded, whichever shall occur first. The election shall be held on a date not less than thirty (30) days nor more than forty-five (45) days after the date upon which the order is adopted.

Notice of the election shall be given by the municipal clerk by notice published in a newspaper published in the municipality. The notice shall be published once each week for three (3) successive weeks preceding the date of the election. The first notice shall be published at least thirty (30) days before the date of the election. Notice shall also be given by posting a copy of the notice at three (3) public places in the municipality not less than twenty-one (21) days before the date of the election. One (1) of the notices shall be posted at the city, town or village hall. In the event that there is no newspaper published in the municipality, such notice shall be published as provided for above in a newspaper that has a general circulation within the municipality and by posting as provided for above. Additionally, the governing authority may publish the notice in that newspaper for as many additional times as may be deemed necessary by the governing authority.

Each candidate shall qualify by petition filed with the municipal clerk by 5:00 p.m. at least twenty (20) days before the date of the election. If the twentieth day to file the petition before the election falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, the petition filed on the business day immediately following the Sunday or legal holiday shall be accepted. The petition shall be signed by not less than the following number of qualified electors:

For an office of a city, town, village or municipal district having a population of one thousand (1,000) or more, not less than fifty (50) qualified electors.

For an office of a city, town, village or municipal district having a population of less than one thousand (1,000), not less than fifteen (15) qualified electors.

No qualifying fee shall be required of any candidate, and the election shall be held as far as practicable in the same manner as municipal general elections.

The candidate receiving a majority of the votes cast in the election shall be elected. If no candidate receives a majority vote at the election, the two (2) candidates receiving the highest number of votes shall have their names placed on the ballot for the election to be held three (3) weeks thereafter. The candidate receiving a majority of the votes cast in the election shall be elected. However, if no candidate receives a majority and there is a tie in the election of those receiving the next highest vote, those receiving the next highest vote and the candidate receiving the highest vote shall have their names placed on the ballot for the election to be held three (3) weeks thereafter, and whoever receives the most votes cast in the election shall be elected.

Should the election held three (3) weeks thereafter result in a tie vote, the prevailing candidate shall be decided by a toss of a coin or by lot fairly and publicly drawn under the supervision of the election commission.

The clerk of the election commission shall then give a certificate of election to the person elected, and return to the Secretary of State a copy of the order of holding the election and runoff election results, certified by the clerk of the governing authority. The person elected shall be commissioned by the Governor.

However, if nineteen (19) days before the date of the election only one (1) person shall have qualified as a candidate, the governing authority, or remainder of the governing authority, shall dispense with the election and appoint that one (1) candidate in lieu of an election. In the event no person shall have qualified by 5:00 p.m. at least twenty (20) days before the date of the election, the governing authority or remainder of the governing authority shall dispense with the election and fill the vacancy by appointment. The clerk of the governing authority shall certify the appointment to the Secretary of State, and the appointed person shall be commissioned by the Governor.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §21-11-9 [Codes 1892, § 3031; 1906, § 3436; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5996; 1930, § 2598; 1942, § 3374-64; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 64; Laws, 1971, ch. 494, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 329]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 261; Laws, 2000, ch. 592, § 14; Laws, 2004, ch. 512, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 434, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 142, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-859.
Date of special municipal election; notice.

Whenever under any statute a special election is required or authorized to be held in any municipality, and the statute authorizing or requiring the election does not specify the time within which the election shall be called, or the notice which shall be given, the governing authorities of the municipality shall, by resolution, fix a date upon which the election shall be held. The date shall not be less than twenty-one (21) nor more than thirty (30) days after the date upon which such resolution is adopted, and not less than three (3) weeks’ notice of the election shall be given by the clerk by a notice published in a newspaper published in the municipality once each week for three (3) weeks next preceding the date of the election, and by posting a copy of the notice at three (3) public places in the municipality. Nothing herein, however, shall be applicable to elections on the question of the issuance of the bonds of a municipality or to general or primary elections for the election of municipal officers.

The provisions of this section shall be applicable to all municipalities of this state, whether operating under a code charter, special charter or the commission form of government, except in cases of conflicts between the provisions of the section and the provisions of the special charter of a municipality, or the law governing the commission form of government, in which cases of conflict the provisions of the special charter or the statutes relative to the commission form of government shall apply.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §21-11-11 [Codes, 1942, § 3374-108; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 108; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 329]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 262; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 143, eff from and after July 1, 2017.